Massachusetts, session 194th, H534.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 71 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following
new section:-
Section 100. Computer Science Education
(a) Every public high school in the commonwealth shall offer not less than 1 foundational
computer science course and ensure that every student has the option to access such course
within a 4-year course of study.
(b) A foundational computer science course offered pursuant to this section shall include
rigorous mathematical or scientific concepts and be consistent with standards adopted by the
board.
SECTION 2. The department of elementary and secondary education shall develop a
micro-credentialing process that would allow educators and other persons interested in teaching
foundational computer science at the high school level to demonstrate competency in the specific
of 2

digital literacy and computer science subject matter knowledge requirements that correspond
with the aspects of the digital literacy and computer science curriculum that would be taught in a
foundational computer science course as described in section 100 of chapter 71, as inserted by
section 1. The micro-credentialing process shall be made available to all educators currently in
the process of meeting the requirements for the digital literacy and computer science 5-12 license
and all others interested in teaching such coursework; provided, however, that completion of the
foundational computer science micro-credentialing process would qualify such person so
credentialed to teach 1 or more foundational computer science courses as described in said
section 100 of said chapter 71, as so inserted, for a period not to exceed 5 years without having
to achieve any other teacher certification requirements except for those determined by the
department to be minimally necessary for said role. The requirements met by a person who has
achieved a micro-credential may be applied toward the requirements necessary for achieving full
certification to teach computer science.
SECTION 3. Section 1 shall take effect for school years beginning on or after July 1,
2026.
of 2